Hawaii statutes.
§322-32 Notice and recording of lien.
Whenever work or improvement is done or completed by the comptroller, the
comptroller shall record in the office of the registrar of conveyances a notice
of the cost of the work so done or completed and a brief description of the
land on which the same is a charge, together with the name of the last known
owner, and shall also serve a copy of the notice upon such owner in the manner
provided in section 322-24. [L 1896, c 61, §8; am L 1911, c 112, §9; RL 1925,
§986; RL 1935, §1336; RL 1945, §2727; RL 1955, §47-31; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§12; HRS §322-32; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Cited: 31 H. 446, 449.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next